Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2354
Public power and irrigation district funds; designation of depositories.

Depositories shall be such banks, capital stock financial institutions, and qualifying mutual financial institutions as shall be from time to time designated by the board of directors of such district by formal resolution duly recorded in the minutes of the proceedings of such board. Such designation may be withdrawn at any time by the board of directors of such district by formal resolution duly entered upon its records, whereupon all such deposits, except those represented by time certificates of deposit, in such bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution shall be immediately withdrawn. All deposits, except those invested in time certificates of deposit, shall be subject to payment on demand upon the check or order of the duly authorized officer or officers of the district. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1941, c. 160, § 2, p. 642;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-2538;

R.S.1943, § 77-2354;

Laws 1973, LB 47, § 2;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 68;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 64.